District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.08

Quorum; delegation.

(a)

Two members of the Ethics Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(b)

The Ethics Board may delegate to an individual member or to the Director of Government Ethics its power to investigate or hold a hearing.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 208, 59 DCR 1862